Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.56.370

Mail theft.

(1) A person is guilty of mail theft if he or she: (a) Commits theft of mail addressed to three or more different addresses; and (b) commits theft of a minimum of ten separate pieces of mail.

(2) Each set of ten separate pieces of stolen mail addressed to three or more different mailboxes constitutes a separate and distinct crime and may be punished accordingly.

(3) Mail theft is a class C felony.

[ 2011 c 164 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—2011 c 164: See note following RCW 9A.56.010.